District of Columbia statutes.
42-3503.06

Continued eligibility.

Sixty days prior to the expiration of any tenant assistance authorized under this subchapter, the Department shall notify the tenant, in writing, that the tenant assistance is about to expire and that the tenant, if eligible and desiring to continue to receive tenant assistance, must reapply within 30 days upon receipt of the notice. The tenant shall reapply by executing under oath or affirmation a statement of continued eligibility on a form approved by the Department and by submitting the form to the Department. Unless the Department determines that the person is not eligible, tenant assistance shall continue for the succeeding 12 months.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 306, 32 DCR 3089
1981 Ed., § 45-2536.